test/src/morphology/N-swda44_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - sõda: # Noun (44) sõda 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     sõda+N+Sg+Nom: sõda
     sõda+N+Sg+Gen: sya
     sõda+N+Sg+Par: sõta
     sõda+N+Sg+Ill: sõtta
     sõda+N+Pl+Gen: sõto
     sõda+N+Pl+Par: sõto
     sõda+N+Pl+Ill: [sõttohe, sõtto]
     sõda+N+Pl+All: sõtolõ
